District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.48

Standards of assistance adopted and applied.

Standards of assistance are adopted superseding the existing standards for requirements, and shall be applied:

(1)

To determine the eligibility of applicants for public assistance; and

(2)

To determine or redetermine the amount of public assistance grant for the recipient.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 548, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.48.